Idaho, session 2025, S1194.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the
Public Health Services Division the following amounts to be expended accord-
ing to the designated programs and expense classes from the listed funds for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. PHYSICAL HEALTH SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $103,400 $150,800 $161,000 $415,200
Idaho Immunization Dedicated Vaccine
Fund 2,500,000 2,500,000
Rural Nursing Loan Repayment
Fund 625,000 625,000
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 150,000 150,000


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 1,804,900 3,621,400 14,575,400 20,001,700
TOTAL $2,058,300 $6,272,200 $15,361,400 $23,691,900
II. SUICIDE PREVENTION AND AWARENESS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $356,000 $820,500 $644,600 $1,821,100
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 0 115,000 80,000 195,000
TOTAL $356,000 $935,500 $724,600 $2,016,100
GRAND TOTAL $2,414,300 $7,207,700 $16,086,000 $25,708,000
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Public Health Services Divi-
sion is hereby increased by four (4.00) for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. FEDERAL FUNDING RESTRICTIONS. Pursuant to Section
67-3511(2), Idaho Code, legislative appropriations shall not be transferred
from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
Appropriations made pursuant to this act contingent on anticipated federal
funding, grants, or programs shall not be supplanted by state funds in the
event of any reduction or elimination of such federal support without Leg-
islative approval. The agency receiving the appropriation shall take all
necessary actions to ensure that the state is not obligated to replace lost
federal funds. Pursuant to Section 67-1917, Idaho Code, the agency will
submit an inventory of federal funds utilized by the agency. State funds ap-
propriated to satisfy match requirements for federal funds shall be reverted
to the maximum extent possible if federal funds requiring match is reduced
or eliminated. The agency shall promptly notify the Budget and Policy Divi-
sion of the Legislative Services Office of any significant changes related
to federal funding, grants, or programs. This does not apply to standard
federal funding adjustments that take place within an agency's cost alloca-
tion plan or indirect expenditure plan for indirect costs and agency support
staff, FMAP adjustments, or entitlement programs.
SECTION 4. NOTIFICATION OF FEDERAL GRANTS. In addition to the require-
ments in Sections 67-3512 and 67-1917, Idaho Code, the Department of Health
and Welfare shall notify the chairmen of the Health and Welfare Committees in


both the Senate and House of Representatives prior to applying or reapplying
for any federal grant. Such notification shall include but is not limited to
the grant type, the CFDA and DUNSF numbers, the title of the grant, the grant
start date, the grant end date, and a brief description of the grant, includ-
ing the source and long-term impact. This information shall also be sent to
the cochairs of the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee.
SECTION 5. REQUIRING A REPORT ON THE TRANSITION OF PASS-THROUGH GRANTS.
In state fiscal year 2026, the Department of Health and Welfare shall provide
a report outlining the transition of pass-through grants for the provision
of clinical services from the seven public health districts to federally
qualified health centers (FQHCs) and other safety net providers. Within the
report, the department shall consider the benefit of connecting uninsured
and underinsured clients to broader health care systems where follow-up
care can be provided. The department shall identify any instances of double
billing for services between federal grants and Medicaid billing and de-
velop a plan to end this practice. The report outlining the considerations
necessary to transition to FQHCs shall be submitted to the Joint Finance-Ap-
propriations Committee and the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the
Legislative Services Office no later than January 5, 2026.
SECTION 6. REQUIRING A REPORT ON THE TRANSITION OF THE DRUG OVERDOSE
PREVENTION PROGRAM. The Department of Health and Welfare shall provide a
report outlining the steps necessary to transition the Drug Overdose Pre-
vention Program (DOPP) from the Division of Public Health to the Office of
Drug Policy (ODP), without interruption of public services. The Department
of Health and Welfare shall collaborate with ODP on considerations needed
to facilitate this transition, such as necessary federal approvals and pro-
posed legislation that would enable the relocation of funding and staff. The
report shall be submitted to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee and
the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office
no later than January 5, 2026.
SECTION 7. REQUIRING A REPORT ON THE TRANSITION OF THE ALZHEIMER'S
DISEASE AND RELATED DEMENTIAS PROGRAM. The Department of Health and Wel-
fare shall provide a report outlining the steps necessary to transition the
Alzheimer's Disease and Related Dementias (ADRD) Program from the Division
of Public Health to the Commission on Aging, without interruption of public
services. The Department of Health and Welfare shall collaborate with the
Commission on Aging on considerations needed to facilitate this transition,
such as necessary federal approvals and proposed legislation that would
enable the relocation of funding and staff. The report shall be submitted
to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee and the Budget and Policy
Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office no later than January
5, 2026.
SECTION 8. REQUIRING A REPORT ON THE TRANSITION OF THE FIT AND FALL
PROOF PROGRAM. The Department of Health and Welfare shall provide a report
outlining the steps necessary to transition the Fit and Fall Proof Program
from the Division of Public Health to the Commission on Aging, without in-


terruption of public services. The Department of Health and Welfare shall
collaborate with the Commission on Aging on considerations needed to fa-
cilitate this transition, such as necessary federal approvals and proposed
legislation that would enable the relocation of funding and staff. The re-
port shall be submitted to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee and
the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office
no later than January 5, 2026.
SECTION 9. REQUIRING A REPORT ON THE SUICIDE PREVENTION PROGRAM. The
Department of Health and Welfare shall provide a report on the cost-benefit
analysis of transitioning from the current 988 crisis line contracted vendor
to Magellan Health. The report shall be submitted to the Joint Finance-Ap-
propriations Committee and the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the
Legislative Services Office no later than January 5, 2026.
SECTION 10. REQUIRING A REPORT ON THE CANCER DATA REGISTRY OF IDAHO. The
Department of Health and Welfare shall provide a report on the cost-benefit
analysis of transitioning from the Cancer Data Registry of Idaho's current
contracted vendor to maintaining this service within the department. The
report shall be submitted to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee and
the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office
no later than December 15, 2025.
SECTION 11. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 12. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State
Controller shall transfer $2,250,000 from the General Fund to the Rural
Nursing Loan Repayment Fund as soon as is practicable for the period July 1,
2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 13. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 319, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Public
Health Services Division $375,000 from the Rural Nursing Loan Repayment Fund
to be expended for trustee and benefit payments for the period July 1, 2024,
through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 14. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 12 and 13 of this act shall be in full force and
effect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 11 of this
act shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.